Washington statutes.
RCW 6.27.260

Execution on judgment against garnishee.

Execution may be issued on the judgment against the garnishee in the same manner as upon any other judgment. The amount made upon any such execution shall be paid by the officer executing it to the clerk of the court from which the execution was issued; and, in cases where judgment has been rendered against the defendant, the amount made on the execution shall be applied to the satisfaction of the judgment, interest and costs against the defendant. In case judgment has not been rendered against the defendant at the time execution issued against the garnishee is returned, any amount made on the execution shall be paid to the clerk of the court from which the execution issued, who shall retain the same until judgment is rendered in the action between the plaintiff and defendant. In case judgment is rendered in favor of the plaintiff, the amount made on the execution against the garnishee shall be applied to the satisfaction of such judgment and the surplus, if any, shall be paid to the defendant. In case judgment is rendered in favor of the defendant, the amount made on the execution against the garnishee shall be paid to the defendant.

[ 1987 c 442 s 1026; 1969 ex.s. c 264 s 21. Formerly RCW 7.33.210.]